Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§ 35-4-101.
Department of health to prescribe rules and regulations; penalty for violation; resisting or interfering with enforcement.

The state department of health shall have the power to prescribe rules and regulations for the management and control of communicable diseases. Any persons violating or refusing to obey such rules and regulations or resisting or interfering with any officer or agent of the state department of health while in the performance of his duties shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by the imposition of such penalty as may be provided by law. Or in the discretion of the court said person may be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 99, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2952; C.S. 1920, § 3615; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 103-224; C.S. 1945, § 63-114; W.S. 1957, § 35-166; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for violation of health laws generally, see §§

35-1-105

,

35-1-106

.

For authority to make rules and regulations generally, see §

35-1-229

.

Stated

in

LePage v. State, 2001 WY 26, 18 P.3d 1177,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 34

, 94 A.L.R.5th 777 (Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Jones v. State Dep't of Health, 2001 WY 28,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 35

, 18 P.3d 1189 (Wyo. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court or other public agency to order vaccination over parental religious objection, 94 ALR5th 613.

§ 35-4-102.
Liability of county for medical services; indigent patients.

The respective counties of the state shall not be liable for the payment of any claim for service rendered by any physician in the treatment of contagious diseases, unless such treatment shall be for the care of indigent persons who are a public charge.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 94, § 4; 1909, ch. 99, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2953; C.S. 1920, § 3616; R.S. 1931, § 103-239; C.S. 1945, § 63-115; W.S. 1957, § 35-167.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 7, ch. 94, Laws 1903, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 35-4-103.
Investigation of diseases; quarantine; regulation of travel; employment of police officers to enforce quarantine; report of county health officer; supplies and expenses.

The department of health shall, immediately after the receipt of information that there is any smallpox, cholera, scarlet fever, diphtheria or other infectious or contagious disease, which is a menace to the public health, in any portion of this state, order the county health officer to immediately investigate the case and report to the state health officer the results of the investigation. The state health officer shall, subject to W.S.

35-4-112

and if in his judgment the occasion requires, direct the county health officer to declare the infected place to be in quarantine. The county health officer shall place any restrictions upon ingress and egress at this location as in his judgment or in the judgment of the state health officer are necessary to prevent the spread of the disease from the infected locality. The county health officer shall upon declaring any city, town or other place to be in quarantine, control the population of the city, town or other place as in his judgment best protects the people and at the same time prevents the spread of the disease. If necessary for the protection of the public health and subject to W.S.

35-4-112

, the state health officer shall establish and maintain a state quarantine and shall enforce practical regulations regarding railroads or other lines of travel into and out of the state of Wyoming as necessary for the protection of the public health. The expenses incurred in maintaining the state quarantine shall be paid out of the funds of the state treasury appropriated for this purpose and in the manner in which other expenses of the department are audited and paid. The county health officer or the department may employ a sufficient number of police officers who shall be under the control of the county health officer, to enforce and carry out any quarantine regulations the department may prescribe. The regulations shall be made public in the most practicable manner in the several counties, cities, towns or other places where the quarantine is established. If the quarantine is established by the county health officer, he shall immediately report his actions to the state health officer. The county health officer shall furnish all supplies and other resources necessary for maintaining the quarantine. Upon certificate of the county health officer approved by the director of the state department of health, the county commissioners of any county where a quarantine has been established shall issue warrants to the proper parties for the payment of all expenses, together with the expense of employing sufficient police force, to maintain and enforce the quarantine. For purposes of this act, “state health officer” means as defined in W.S. 9-2-103(e).

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 12; C.S. 1910, § 2939; C.S. 1920, § 3602; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 103-211; C.S. 1945, § 63-117; W.S. 1957, § 35-168; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2004, ch. 102, § 1; ch. 130 § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty of cooperation to prevent the spread of contagious diseases, see §

35-1-223

.

As to power and duty to enforce isolation and quarantine, see §

35-1-240

.

For provisions dealing with contagious and infectious diseases among livestock generally, see ch. 19 of title 11.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, rewrote the section, clarifying provisions pertaining to the investigation of communicable diseases and quarantine by the state and county health officers and deleting obsolete provisions.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, substituted “W.S. 9-2-103(e)” for “W.S. 9-2-101(f)”; and made stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

This section is set out as amended by Laws 2004, ch. 102, pursuant to the direction of the legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in the last sentence, means Laws 1991, ch. 221, which appears as various sections throughout the Wyoming Statutes. See the Table of Disposition of Acts in volume 11.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of doctor or other health practitioner to third party contracting contagious disease from doctor's patient, 3 ALR5th 370.

§ 35-4-104.
Quarantine regulations generally; modification or abrogation.

In case of the existence of smallpox, cholera, typhoid fever, scarlet fever, diphtheria, or any infectious or contagious disease, including venereal diseases, that is a menace to public health, or of any epidemic of any such disease, the state health officer may, if he deems proper, proceed to the locality where such disease exists, and make such investigation as is necessary to ascertain the cause therefor, and in case of quarantine established by the county health officer, the state health officer shall have power after close personal inspection, to modify or abrogate any or all quarantine regulations after the same have been established.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 17; C.S. 1910, § 2944; C.S. 1920, § 3607; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 103-216; C.S. 1945, § 63-122; W.S. 1957, § 35-169; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to venereal diseases generally, see §§

35-4-130

to

35-4-138

.

§ 35-4-105.
Escape from quarantine deemed crime; punishment.

Any person or persons confined in any quarantine established in this state under the provisions of this act who shall escape therefrom or attempt to escape therefrom, without having been dismissed upon the certificate or authority of the county health officer may be charged with a crime and shall be quarantined for tuberculosis or other emergent disease or condition that might pose comparable risk for transmission in the absence of strict quarantine, and confined to a site designated by the state health officer and the director of the department of health until such disease is cured or becomes inactive or noninfectious. Upon conviction of a violation of this section, a person may be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 23; C.S. 1910, § 2950; Laws 1913, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3613; R.S. 1931, § 103-222; C.S. 1945, § 63-129; W.S. 1957, § 35-170; Laws 1967, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 44, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty and liability for spreading contagious disease, see §§

35-4-109

,

35-4-110

.

Editor's notes. —

“This act” apparently refers to Laws 1967, ch. 82 which appears as this section. From the context in which it is used, however, the reference is to this chapter.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “custody” under 18 USC § 751(a) defining offense of escape from custody, 114 ALR Fed 581.

§ 35-4-106.
Vaccination for smallpox; penalty for refusal.

The state department of health may adopt such measures for the general vaccination of the inhabitants of any city, town or county in the state, as they shall deem proper and necessary to prevent the introduction or arrest the progress of smallpox; and every person who shall refuse to be vaccinated, or prevent any person under his care and control from being vaccinated, or who shall fail to present himself or herself to the county health officer or a practicing physician acting under the direction of the department or county health officer, for the purpose of being vaccinated, if such physician believes vaccination necessary, shall upon conviction be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less than ten dollars ($10.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than thirty (30) days.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 13; C.S. 1910, § 2940; C.S. 1920, § 3603; R.S. 1931, § 103-212; C.S. 1945, § 63-118; W.S. 1957, § 35-171; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court or other public agency to order vaccination over parental religious objection, 94 ALR5th 613.

§ 35-4-107.
Report required of physician; record of each case to be kept; duty of individuals to report diseases.

Pursuant to department of health rules and regulations, the state health officer or his designee shall publish a list of communicable diseases or conditions to be reported by licensed physicians and laboratories in the state. It shall be the duty of every practicing or licensed physician or other health care provider as provided by department rules and regulations in the state of Wyoming to report immediately to the state health officer or his designee in the manner established by department rule and regulation through published reporting procedures provided to each licensed physician or laboratory. The state health officer or his designee shall collect and provide information which may include the name of the person suffering from disease only to the county health officer or health representatives where disease control efforts are required. For purposes of this section, “health representatives” means those health care workers assigned by federal, state or local health authorities to assist with disease control and investigation efforts under the direct supervision of the state health officer or his designee and local county health officer. Any person knowing of a case of a serious contagious or infectious disease, not under the care of a physician, may report the same to the state health officer or his designee or the health officer of the county in which the disease exists.

Pursuant to department of health rules and regulations, there may be a review of medical records by the state health officer, his designee or their designated health care representatives who shall be under the direct supervision of the state health officer or his designee to confirm diagnosis, investigate causes or identify other cases of disease conditions in a region, community or workplace in the state to determine if proper measures have been taken to protect public health and safety. Notwithstanding other provisions of state law, the review of records may occur without patient consent, but shall be kept confidential and shall be restricted to information necessary for the control, investigation and prevention of disease conditions dangerous to the public health. Any person who receives medical information under this subsection shall not disclose that information for any other purpose other than for purposes of the investigation and disease control efforts. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 15; C.S. 1910, § 2942; C.S. 1920, § 3605; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 103-214; C.S. 1945, § 63-120; W.S. 1957, § 35-172; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1997, ch. 132, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duty of county health officer to report diseases, see §

35-1-223

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “An Ounce of Prevention Where There is No Cure: Aids and Public Health in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of doctor or other health practitioner to third party contracting contagious disease from doctor's patient, 3 ALR5th 370.

§ 35-4-108.
Penalty for failure to report or for false report.

Any practicing, licensed physician or other person required to report who fails to report to the state health officer or his designee any case of disease in the manner provided in W.S.

35-4-107

, or who willfully makes any false report regarding any case, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 16; C.S. 1910, § 2943; C.S. 1920, § 3606; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 103-215; C.S. 1945, § 63-121; W.S. 1957, § 35-173; Laws 1997, ch. 132, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for failure to report diseases, see §

35-1-105

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 24, ch. 55, Laws 1901, repealed R.S. 1899, ch. 8, title 16, division 1.

§ 35-4-109.
Spreading contagious disease; prohibited.

Any person who shall knowingly have or use about his premises, or who shall convey or cause to be conveyed into any neighborhood, any clothing, bedding or other substance used by, or in taking care of, any person afflicted with the smallpox or other infectious or contagious disease, or infected thereby, or shall do any other act with intent to, or necessarily tending to the spread of such disease, into any neighborhood or locality, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof before any court of competent jurisdiction shall be fined in any sum not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment; and the court trying any such offender may also include in any judgment rendered, an order to the effect that the clothing or other property infected be burned or otherwise destroyed, and shall have power to carry such order into effect.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 33, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1012; R.S. 1899, § 5112; C.S. 1910, § 5963; C.S. 1920, § 7252; R.S. 1931, § 32-707; C.S. 1945, § 9-709; W.S. 1957, § 35-174.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for breaking quarantine, see §

35-4-105

.

§ 35-4-110.
Spreading contagious disease; liability for damages in civil action.

Any person guilty of violating the provisions of W.S.

35-4-109

, in addition to the penalties therein prescribed, shall be liable in a civil action in damages to any and all persons, who may, from that cause, become infected with such contagious disease; said damages shall be so assessed as to include, in addition to other damages, all expenses incurred by reason of such sickness, loss of time and burial expenses; and such action may also be maintained by the representative of any deceased person.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 33, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1013; R.S. 1899, § 5113; C.S. 1910, § 5964; C.S. 1920, § 7253; R.S. 1931, § 32-708; C.S. 1945, § 9-710; W.S. 1957, § 35-175.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of doctor or other health practitioner to third party contracting contagious disease from doctor's patient, 3 ALR5th 370.

§ 35-4-111.
Reporting of Reye's Syndrome.

Every hospital or local health officer shall immediately report every diagnosed case of Reye’s Syndrome to the state health officer of the department of health.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 2, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-4-112.
Right of appeal of quarantine.

Any person who has been quarantined pursuant to this act [this article] may appeal to the district court at any time for release from the quarantine. The court may hold a hearing on the appeal after notice is provided to the state health officer at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the hearing. After the hearing, if the court finds that the quarantine is not reasonably necessary to protect the public health, it shall order the person released from quarantine. The burden of proof for the need for the quarantine shall be on the state health officer, except that in the case of bona fide scientific or medical uncertainty the court shall give deference to the professional judgment of the state health officer unless the person quarantined proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the quarantine is not reasonably necessary to protect the public health.

Any person quarantined shall have the right to communicate by telephone or any other available electronic means, but the state health officer may, in order to protect the public health, deny the quarantined person’s right to meet in person with any person not subject to the quarantine, except that a parent or legal guardian may upon request be quarantined with the minor patient.

In the event of a public health emergency of unknown effect, the state health officer may impose a temporary quarantine until there is sufficient information to determine what actions, if any, are reasonably needed to protect the public health.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

Although the words “this act” were enacted by Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1, codified as §§

33-16-111

,

33-16-207

,

33-16-318

,

33-24-155

,

35-1-241

, and

35-4-112

through

35-4-115

, the term was apparently intended to mean “this article.”

§ 35-4-113.
Treatment when consent is not available; quarantine.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, W.S.

14-4-116

and

21-4-309

, the state health officer shall not subject any person to any vaccination or medical treatment without the consent of the person.

During a public health emergency, the state health officer may subject a person to vaccination or medical treatment without consent in the following circumstances:

If the parent, legal guardian or other adult person authorized to consent to medical treatment of a minor child cannot be located and consulted and the vaccination of or medical treatment for the minor child is reasonably needed to protect the public health or protect the minor child from disease, death, disability or suffering;

If the person authorized to consent on behalf of an incompetent person cannot be located and consulted and the vaccination of or medical treatment for the incompetent person is reasonably needed to protect the public health or protect the incompetent person from disease, death, disability or suffering.

If a person withholds or refuses consent for himself, a minor or other incompetent when the vaccination or medical treatment is reasonably needed to protect the health of others from a disease carrying the risk of death or disability, then the person for whom the vaccination or medical treatment is refused may be quarantined by the state health officer.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to exceptions with reference to religion, see §

35-1-201

.

§ 35-4-114.
Immunity from liability.

During a public health emergency as defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i) and subject to subsection (d) of this section, any health care provider or other person, including a business entity, who in good faith follows the instructions of a state, city, town or county health officer or who acts in good faith in responding to the public health emergency is immune from any liability arising from complying with those instructions or acting in good faith. This immunity shall apply to health care providers who are retired, who have an inactive license or who are licensed in another state without a valid Wyoming license and while performing as a volunteer during a declared public health emergency as defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i). This immunity shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

The licensing boards for any health care provider holding a permit or license as a health care provider regulated under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes shall provide by rule and regulations for the temporary licensure of health care providers during a public health emergency as declared by the governor pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i). If necessary during a declared public health emergency, the state health officer may issue temporary practice licenses to health care providers who are retired, who have an inactive license or who are licensed in another state without a valid Wyoming license pending action on an application for issuance of a temporary license by the appropriate licensing board pursuant to this subsection.

All temporary health care provider licenses issued by the state health officer under subsection (b) of this section shall terminate automatically upon declaration by the governor, pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i), that the public health emergency has ended.

Any health care provider, person or entity shall be immune from liability for damages in an action involving a COVID-19 liability claim unless the person seeking damages proves that the health care provider, person or entity took actions that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit any other immunity available under law, including the immunity provided in subsection (a) of this section. As used in this subsection, “COVID-19 liability claim” means as defined by W.S. 1-1-141(a)(iii).

Any acts or omissions constituting the basis of a COVID-19 liability claim as defined by W.S. 1-1-141(a)(iii) shall be stated with particularity and shall be proven by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2008, ch. 55, § 1; 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 2021 ch. 118, § 2, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a) added “as defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i)” and “in responding to the public health emergency” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence; added (b) and (c).

The 2020 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), added “including a business entity,” following “or other person”, substituted “a state, city, town or county health officer or who acts in good faith in responding” for “the state health officer in responding” preceding “to the public health emergency”, and added “or acting in good faith” at the end.

Laws 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 7 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved May 20, 2020.

The 2021 amendment

added "and subject to subsection (d) of this section" in the first sentence of (a); and added (d) and (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 118, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

§ 35-4-115.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Public health emergency” means an occurrence or imminent threat of an illness or health condition caused by an epidemic or pandemic disease, a novel and highly fatal infectious agent or a biological toxin that poses a substantial risk of a significant number of human fatalities or incidents of permanent or long-term disability. The governor shall declare when a public health emergency exists or has ended;

“Quarantine” means:

The physical separation and confinement of an individual or group of individuals that has been, or may have been, exposed to, or is reasonably believed to be infected with, a contagious or possibly contagious disease, from nonquarantined individuals, to prevent or limit the transmission of the disease to nonquarantined individuals;

The isolation of a geographic area where individuals are located who have been or are reasonably believed to have been exposed to or infected by a contagious or possibly contagious disease; or

The physical separation and confinement of an individual or group of individuals or the isolation of a geographic area where a public health emergency of unknown effect has occurred or is reasonably believed to have occurred.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.